Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-118.03
Third-party claims; failure to give notice; effect.

If either party makes a claim or prosecutes a third-party action without giving notice to the other party, the party bringing the claim and prosecuting such action shall not deduct expenses or attorney's fees from the amount payable to the other party.

Laws 2005, LB 13, § 25.